src/fst/stems/propernouns.lexc
LEXICON propernouns
Aleksei+N+Prop:Aleksei PROP_REBOI  "Aleksei" ;
Juakko+N+Prop:Juakko PROP_RUADO  "" ;
Andrei+N+Prop:Andrei PROP_REBOI  "Andrei" ;
Anuksenlinnu+N+Prop:Anuksen#linna PROP_MUARJU  "Aunuksenkapunki, Aunuksenlinna" ;
FINKA-projektu+N+Prop:FINKA-projekta PROP_MUARJU  "FINKA-projekti" ;
Ižändy+N+Prop:Ižändä PROP_PÄIVY  "" ;
Jyskyjärvi+N+Prop:Jyskyjärv PROP_NIMI  "" ;
Jänisjärvi+N+Prop:Jänisjärv PROP_NIMI  "" ;
Kaidʼärvi+N+Prop:Kaidʼärv PROP_NIMI  "" ;
Kendʼärvi+N+Prop:Kendʼärv PROP_NIMI  "" ;
Kentjärvi+N+Prop:Kentjärv PROP_NIMI  "" ;
Keskoijärvi+N+Prop:Keskoijärv PROP_NIMI  "" ;
Kevätjärvi+N+Prop:Kevätjärv PROP_NIMI  "" ;
Kiitehenjärvi+N+Prop:Kiitehenjärv PROP_NIMI  "" ;
Kirvesjärvi+N+Prop:Kirvesjärv PROP_NIMI  "" ;
Kivijärvi+N+Prop:Kivijärv PROP_NIMI  "" ;
Kolʼa+N+Prop:Kolʼa PROP_KALA  "" ;
Kotkatjärvi+N+Prop:Kotkatjärv PROP_NIMI  "" ;
Kuujärvi+N+Prop:Kuujärv PROP_NIMI  "" ;
Ladvujärvi+N+Prop:Ladvujärv PROP_NIMI  "" ;
Latvajärvi+N+Prop:Latvajärv PROP_NIMI  "" ;
Lemijärvi+N+Prop:Lemijärv PROP_NIMI  "" ;
Lilikjärvi+N+Prop:Lilikjärv PROP_NIMI  "" ;
Ližmjärvi+N+Prop:Ližmjärv PROP_NIMI  "" ;
Lohijärvi+N+Prop:Lohijärv PROP_NIMI  "" ;
Muašjärvi+N+Prop:Muašjärv PROP_NIMI  "" ;
Mujehjärvi+N+Prop:Mujehjärv PROP_NIMI  "" ;
Munjärvi+N+Prop:Munjärv PROP_NIMI  "" ;
Nevvostoliitto+N+Prop:Nevvostoliitto PROP_RUADO  "Neuvostoliitto" ;
Nikolai+N+Prop:Nikolai PROP_REBOI  "Nikolai" ;
Nurmijärvi+N+Prop:Nurmijärv PROP_NIMI  "" ;
Olʼga+N+Prop:Olʼga PROP_OZA_FEM  "Olga" ;
Ondojärvi+N+Prop:Ondojärv PROP_NIMI  "" ;
Petroskoi+N+Prop:Petroskoi PROP_PAPPI  "" ;
Pistojärvi+N+Prop:Pistojärv PROP_NIMI  "" ;
Piäjärvi+N+Prop:Piäjärv PROP_NIMI  "" ;
Porajärvi+N+Prop:Porajärv PROP_NIMI  "" ;
Puanʼärvi+N+Prop:Puanʼärv PROP_NIMI  "" ;
Pyhäjärvi+N+Prop:Pyhäjärv PROP_NIMI  "" ;
Rukajärvi+N+Prop:Rukajärv PROP_NIMI  "" ;
Santtu+N+Prop:Santtu PROP_KOIVU  "Santtu" ;
Sergei+N+Prop:Sergei PROP_REBOI  "Sergei" ;
Siämärvi+N+Prop:Siämärv PROP_NIMI  "" ;
Sofia+N+Prop:Sofia PROP_KALA  "" ;
Suigärvi+N+Prop:Suigärv PROP_NIMI  "" ;
Suomi+N+Prop:Suom PROP_NIMI  "Suomi" ;
Tulemjärvi+N+Prop:Tulemjärv PROP_NIMI  "" ;
Tulomjärvi+N+Prop:Tulomjärv PROP_NIMI  "" ;
Uksjärvi+N+Prop:Uksjärv PROP_NIMI  "" ;
Vahjärvi+N+Prop:Vahjärv PROP_NIMI  "" ;
Viro+N+Prop:Viro PROP_RUNO  "Viro" ;
Vodlajärvi+N+Prop:Vodlajärv PROP_NIMI  "" ;
Vuohtjärvi+N+Prop:Vuohtjärv PROP_NIMI  "" ;
Čičiliušku-tyttiteatru+N+Prop:Čičiliušku-tyttiteatra PROP_MUARJU  "Čičiliušku-nukketeatteri" ;
Šotjärvi+N+Prop:Šotjärv PROP_NIMI  "" ;
Šukkajärvi+N+Prop:Šukkajärv PROP_NIMI  "" ;
Rintamaa+N+Prop:Rintamaa PROP_KALA  "" ;
Karhumaa+N+Prop:Karhumaa PROP_KALA  "" ;
Piia+N+Prop:Piia PROP_KALA  "" ;
Harjunharja+N+Prop:Harjunharja PROP_KALA  "" ;
Junikka+N+Prop:Junikka PROP_KALA  "" ;
Lukka+N+Prop:Lukka PROP_KALA  "" ;
Pyhälä+N+Prop:Pyhälä PROP_KALA  "" ;
Tuikkala+N+Prop:Tuikkala PROP_KALA  "" ;
Samppala+N+Prop:Samppala PROP_KALA  "" ;
Kentala+N+Prop:Kentala PROP_KALA  "" ;
Kaarlela+N+Prop:Kaarlela PROP_KALA  "" ;
Säilä+N+Prop:Säilä PROP_KALA  "" ;
Lehtilä+N+Prop:Lehtilä PROP_KALA  "" ;
Tokola+N+Prop:Tokola PROP_KALA  "" ;
Scaevola+N+Prop:Scaevola PROP_KALA  "" ;
Järviluoma+N+Prop:Järviluoma PROP_KALA  "" ;
Honkaranta+N+Prop:Honkaranta PROP_KALA  "" ;
Mäki+N+Prop:Mäki PROP_KALA  "" ;
Palomäki+N+Prop:Palomäki PROP_KALA  "" ;
Kuorikoski+N+Prop:Kuorikoski PROP_KALA  "" ;
Huhmarniemi+N+Prop:Huhmarniemi PROP_KALA  "" ;
Sinivuori+N+Prop:Sinivuori PROP_KALA  "" ;
Korpijärvi+N+Prop:Korpijärvi PROP_KALA  "" ;
Tuikkanen+N+Prop:Tuikkanen PROP_KALA  "" ;
Poranen+N+Prop:Poranen PROP_KALA  "" ;
Kupiainen+N+Prop:Kupiainen PROP_KALA  "" ;
Vepsäläinen+N+Prop:Vepsäläinen PROP_KALA  "" ;
Kaipainen+N+Prop:Kaipainen PROP_KALA  "" ;
Välinen+N+Prop:Välinen PROP_KALA  "" ;
Heikkurinen+N+Prop:Heikkurinen PROP_KALA  "" ;
Ruohonen+N+Prop:Ruohonen PROP_KALA  "" ;
Hilonen+N+Prop:Hilonen PROP_KALA  "" ;
Kuronen+N+Prop:Kuronen PROP_KALA  "" ;
Romunen+N+Prop:Romunen PROP_KALA  "" ;
Pinokkio+N+Prop:Pinokkio PROP_KALA  "" ;
Paltamo+N+Prop:Paltamo PROP_KALA  "" ;
Oudas+N+Prop:Oudas PROP_KALA  "" ;
Tiaislaavu+N+Prop:Tiaislaavu PROP_KALA  "" ;
